Utah statutes.
26-33a-106.1.   Health care cost and reimbursement data.

(1) (a)  The committee shall, as funding is available, establish an advisory panel to advise the committee on the development of a plan for the collection and use of health care data pursuant to Subsection 26-33a-104(6) and this section.

(b)  The advisory panel shall include:

(i)  the chairman of the Utah Hospital Association;

(ii)  a representative of a rural hospital as designated by the Utah Hospital Association;

(iii)  a representative of the Utah Medical Association;

(iv)  a physician from a small group practice as designated by the Utah Medical Association;

(v)  two representatives who are health insurers, appointed by the committee;

(vi)  a representative from the Department of Health as designated by the executive director of the department;

(vii)  a representative from the committee;

(viii)  a consumer advocate appointed by the committee;

(ix)  a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of the House; and

(x)  a member of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate.

(c)  The advisory panel shall elect a chair from among its members, and shall be staffed by the committee.

(2) (a)  The committee shall, as funding is available:

(i)  establish a plan for collecting data from data suppliers, as defined in Section 26-33a-102, to determine measurements of cost and reimbursements for risk adjusted episodes of health care;

(ii)  share data regarding insurance claims and an individual's and small employer group's health risk factor with insurers participating in the defined contribution market created in Title 31A, Chapter 30, Part 2, Defined Contribution Arrangements, only to the extent necessary for:

(A)  establishing rates and prospective risk adjusting in the defined contribution arrangement market; and

(B)  risk adjusting in the defined contribution arrangement market; and

(iii)  assist the Legislature and the public with awareness of, and the promotion of, transparency in the health care market by reporting on:

(A)  geographic variances in medical care and costs as demonstrated by data available to the committee; and

(B)  rate and price increases by health care providers:

(I)  that exceed the Consumer Price Index - Medical as provided by the United States Bureau of Labor statistics;

(II)  as calculated yearly from June to June; and

(III)  as demonstrated by data available to the committee.

(b)  The plan adopted under this Subsection (2) shall include:

(i)  the type of data that will be collected;

(ii)  how the data will be evaluated;

(iii)  how the data will be used;

(iv)  the extent to which, and how the data will be protected; and

(v)  who will have access to the data.



Amended by Chapter 279, 2012 General Session

